Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 13
UNIFORM CHILD-CUSTODY JURISDICTION
AND ENFORCEMENT ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 6 of chapter 46, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 2000, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2000, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers for sections that were relocated as a part of the repeal and reenactment are shown in editor's notes following each section.

Law reviews:

For comment, "Temporary

C

ustody Under the Uniform

C

hild Custody Jurisdiction Act: Influence Without Modification", see 48 U. Colo. L. Rev. 603 (1977); for article, "The Role of Children's Counsel in Contested Child Custody, Visitation and Support Cases", see 15 Colo. Law. 224 (1986); for article, "Waking the Dormant PKPA in Colorado", see 21 Colo. Law. 2209 (1992); for article, "Nuts and Bolts of the PKPA", see 22 Colo. Law. 2397 (1993); for article, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Enforcement Act: Part I", see 29 Colo. Law. 73 (Sept. 2000); for article, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Enforcement Act: Part II", see 29 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2000); for article, "Interstate Family Law Jurisdiction: Simplifying Complex Questions", see 31 Colo. Law. 77 (Sept. 2002); for article, "Colorado's Uniform Interstate Family Support Act: 2004 Changes and Clarifications", see 33 Colo. Law. 99 (Nov. 2004); for article, "An Introduction to Family Law and the Military", see 37 Colo. Law. 69 (Oct. 2008).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 JURISDICTION

PART 3 ENFORCEMENT

PART 4 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS